Massachusetts, session 194th, H1349.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 23A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:- 
Section 70: Establishing Microbusiness and Small Business Banking Access Working 
Group 
Section 70. (a) There shall be a microbusiness and small business banking access 
advisory board, hereinafter referred to as the advisory board, to identify opportunities to improve 
access to banking for microbusinesses and small businesses, including but not limited to socially 
and economically disadvantaged enterprises and businesses and nonprofit organizations that 
partner with or receive assistance from the executive office of economic development or the 
Massachusetts development finance agency 

of 5 11  (b)  The advisory board shall consist of: the secretary of economic development or their 
designee, who shall serve as chair; the executive director of the Massachusetts development 
finance agency or their designee who shall serve as vice chair; the commissioner of banks or 
their designee; the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on community development 
and small business or their designees; the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on 
financial services of their designees; the chair and vice chair of the black and latino legislative 
caucus; the house and senate chairs of the caucus of women legislators; 1 member of the house 
who shall be appointed by the minority leader; 1 member of the senate who shall be appointed by 
the minority leader; the executive director of the commission on the status of women established 
under section 66 of chapter 3 of the General Laws; the executive director of Coalition for an 
Equitable Economy of their designee; the executive director of the Black Economic Council of 
Massachusetts or their designee; the executive director of the Massachusetts Association of 
Community Development Corporations or their designee; 1 person appointed by the governor 
who shall own a small business and have experience or expertise related to reducing gender, 
racial and economic disparities in economic development; 1 person appointed by the governor 
who shall own a microbusiness business and have experience or expertise related to reducing 
gender, racial and economic disparities in economic development; 1 person appointed by the 
governor who should currently serve as executive director of a community development 
corporation; 1 person appointed by the governor who should currently serve as executive director 
of a community development financial institutions; 1 person appointed by the governor with 
experience or expertise in nonprofit or other nontraditional lending; 1 person appointed by the 
treasurer with experience or expertise leading the massachusetts small business banking 

of 5 33 partnership; 1 person appointed by the treasurer with experience or expertise leading a business 
support organization; and 1 person to be appointed by the commission on the status of women. 
(c)  The advisory board shall: (i) review and evaluate state and federal programs and 
regulations related commercial banking access for microbusinesses and small businesses, 
including but not limited to those that connect underserved small businesses with banking access 
through business support organizations; (ii) analyze laws, regulations, and programs in other 
states that encourage banking access for microbusinesses and small businesses, particularly 
socially or economically disadvantaged enterprises, including data by race and other relevant 
demographics; (iii) examine opportunities available within existing programs offered by the 
executive office of economic development and the massachusetts development finance agency to 
encourage recipients of capital or technical assistance to make connections with banks and other 
financial institutions through business support organizations and state agencies; and (iv) 
recommend policies to the executive office of economic development, the massachusetts 
development finance agency, and the legislature to further encourage access to banking by 
underserved microbusinesses and small businesses. 
(d)  The commission shall submit its report together with recommendations, if any, to the 
clerks of the house of representatives and the senate not later than June 1, 2026. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 23A of the General Laws, is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:- 
Section 71: Establishing Microbusiness and Small Business Commercial Insurance 
Special Legislative Commission 

of 5 54  Section 71. (a) There shall be a special legislative commission pursuant to section 2A of 
chapter 4 of the General Laws to identify opportunities to improve access to commercial 
insurance for microbusinesses and small businesses, including but not limited to socially and 
economically disadvantaged enterprises and businesses and nonprofit organizations that partner 
with or receive assistance from the executive office of economic development or the 
massachusetts development finance agency. 
(b)  The special legislative commission shall consist of: the house and senate chairs of the 
joint committee on community development and small business, who shall serve as co-chairs; the 
house and senate chairs of the joint committee on financial services; the chair and vice chair of 
the massachusetts caucus of black and latino legislators; the house and senate chairs of the 
caucus of women legislators; 1 member of the house who shall be appointed by the minority 
leader; 1 member of the senate who shall be appointed by the minority leader; the secretary of 
economic development or their designee; the executive director of the massachusetts 
development finance agency or their designee; the commissioner of insurance or their designee; 
the commissioner of banks or their designee; the executive director of the commission on the 
status of women established under section 66 of chapter 3 of the General Laws; the executive 
director of Coalition for an Equitable Economy of their designee; the executive director of the 
Black Economic Council of Massachusetts or their designee; the executive director of the 
Massachusetts Association of Community Development Corporations or their designee; 1 person 
appointed by the governor who shall own a small business and have experience or expertise 
related to reducing gender, racial and economic disparities in economic development; 1 person 
appointed by the governor who shall own a microbusiness business and have experience or 
expertise related to reducing gender, racial and economic disparities in economic development; 1 

of 5 77 person appointed by the governor who should currently serve as executive director of a 
community development corporation; 1 person appointed by the governor who should currently 
serve as executive director of a community development financial institutions; 1 person 
appointed by the governor with experience or expertise in nonprofit or other nontraditional 
lending; 1 person appointed by the treasurer with experience or expertise leading the 
massachusetts small business banking partnership; 1 person appointed by the treasurer with 
experience or expertise leading a business support organization; and 1 person to be appointed by 
the commission on the status of women. 
(c)  The special legislative commission shall: (i) review and evaluate state and federal 
programs and regulations related commercial insurance access for microbusinesses and small 
businesses; (ii) analyze laws, regulations, and programs in other states that encourage 
commercial insurance access for microbusinesses and small businesses, particularly socially or 
economically disadvantaged enterprises, including data by race and other relevant demographics; 
(iii) examine opportunities available within existing programs offered by the executive office of 
economic development and the massachusetts development finance agency to encourage 
recipients of capital or technical assistance to make connections with commercial insurance 
through business support organizations and state agencies; and (iv) recommend policies to the 
executive office of economic development, the massachusetts development finance agency, and 
the legislature, to further encourage access to commercial insurance by underserved 
microbusinesses and small businesses. 
(d)  The commission shall submit its report together with recommendations for 
legislation, if any, to the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate not later than June 
1, 2026.